Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1234
Prisoner; deposition; manner of taking.

While a prisoner's deposition is being taken he shall remain in the custody of the officer having him in charge, who shall afford reasonable facilities for the taking of the deposition.

R.S.1867, Code § 362, p. 454;

R.S.1913, § 7926;

C.S.1922, § 8868;

C.S.1929, § 20-1234;

R.S.1943, § 25-1234.